de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Bodengrund für Aquarien: Aquariumboden; Aragonitsande; Zerkleinerte Korallen; Glassteine; Kies; Kieselsteine; Sand
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Sten og substrater til akvarier: Akvariejord; Aragonittsand; Knuste koraller; Glassteiner; Grus; Småstein; Sand
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Ghiaia e substrati per acquari: Suolo per acquario; Sabbie di Aragonite; Coralli schiacciati; Pietre di vetro; Ghiaia; Ciottoli; Sabbia
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水族箱沙砾/铺垫物: 水族馆土壤; 文石砂; 碎珊瑚; 玻璃石; 碎石; 鹅卵石; 沙子
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Żwirek i podłoża akwariowe: Gleby akwariowe; Piaski aragonitowe; Rozdrobnione koralowce; Kamienie szklane; Żwir; Kamyczki; Piasek
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Akvaryum Taş ve Substratları: Akvaryum Toprağı; Aragonit Kumları; Ezilmiş Mercanlar; Cam Taşlar; Çakıl; Çakıl Taşları; Kum
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Akváriový štrk a substráty: Akváriová pôda; Aragonitový piesok; Drvené koraly; Sklenené kamene; Štrk; Kamienky; Piesok
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaariosora ja pohjamateriaalit: Akvaarion pohjamateriaali; Aragoniittihiekat; Murskattu koralli; Lasikivet; Sora; Kivet; Hiekka
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Sỏi và lớp lót bể cá: Đất hồ cá; Cát Aragonite trải nền; San hô vụn; Đá thủy tinh; Sỏi; Đá cuội; Cát
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquarium Gravel & Substrates: Aquarium Soil; Aragonite Sands; Crushed Corals; Glass Stones; Gravel; Pebbles; Sand
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > กรวดและวัสดุรองพื้นตู้ปลา: ดินปลูกไม้น้ำ; ทรายอะราโกไนต์; ปะการังบด; หินแก้ว; กรวด; ก้อนกรวด; ทราย
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Гравий и грунт для аквариумов: Аквариумный грунт; Арагонитовый песок; Коралловая крошка; Стеклянные камни; Гравий; Галька; Песок
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > 水槽用底砂・底床材: 水槽用ソイル; アラゴナイトサンド; 砕いたサンゴ; ガラスストーン; 砂利; 小石; 砂
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Substratos e cascalho para aquários: Solo de aquário; Areia de aragonite; Cascalho de coral; Pedras de vidro; Cascalho; Seixos; Areia
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Cascalho e substratos para aquário: Solo para aquário; Areias aragonita; Corais esmagados; Pedras de vidro; Cascalho; Seixos; Areia
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Akváriumi kavics és szubsztrátok: Akváriumtalaj; Aragonithomok; Zúzott korallok; Üvegkövek; Kavics; Kövek; Homok
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Štěrk a písek do akvária: Akvarijní půda; Aragonitové písky; Drcené korály; Skleněné kameny; Štěrk; Oblázky; Písek
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Šljunak i podloge za akvarij: Tlo za akvarij; Aragonitni pijesak; Zdrobljeni koralji; Stakleno kamenje; Šljunak; Kamenčići; Pijesak
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Akvariumų žvirgždas ir substratai: Žemė akvariumams; Aragonito smėlis; Susmulkinti koralai; Stikliniai akmenukai; Žvirgždas; Akmenukai; Smėlis
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Gravier et substrats pour aquariums: Sol pour aquarium; Sable d’aragonite; Coraux écrasés; Pierres de verre; Gravier; Galets; Sable
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Чакъл и субстрати за аквариум: Почва за аквариум; Арагонитов пясък; Натрошени корали; Стъклени камъни; Чакъл; Камъчета; Пясък
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Sustratos y arena para acuarios: Sustrato para acuario; Arenas de aragonito; Corales triturados; Piedras de vidrio; Grava; Guijarros; Arena
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Pietriș și substraturi pentru acvariu: Pământ pentru acvariu; Nisip din aragonit; Coral pisat; Pietre din sticlă; Pietriș; Pietricele; Nisip
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Kiezels en voedingsbodem voor aquaria: Aquariumgrind; Aragonietzand; Verbrijzelde koralen; Glazen stenen; Kiezels; Steentjes; Zand
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수족관 자갈/바닥재: 수족관 소일; 아라고나이트 모래; 뼈산호; 유리석; 자갈; 조약돌; 모래
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Sand och stenar till akvarier: Akvariejord; Aragonitsand; Krossade koraller; Glasstenar; Grus; Småsten; Sand
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Prod in substrati za akvarije: Podlage za akvarije; Peski za akvarije; Zdrobljene korale; Stekleni kamni; Prod; Kamenčki; Pesek
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Bundlag og substrat til akvarium: Akvariejord; Aragonitsand; Knuste koraller; Glassten; Grus; Småsten; Sand
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Χαλίκι & υποστρώματα ενυδρείου: Χώμα ενυδρείου; Άμμος Αραγονίτη; Θρυμματισμένα κοράλλια; Γυάλινες πέτρες; Χαλίκι; Βότσαλα; Άμμος
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水族箱底砂: 水族箱土壤; 霰石砂; 珊瑚砂; 玻璃石; 砂礫; 鵝卵石; 沙子